Hawaii statutes.
[§340E-4.8] Water catchment systems.
(a) The department shall establish a program to conduct annual testing of
water from water catchment systems for lead and copper. Any resident residing
in a legal dwelling which relies on a water catchment system for the resident's
water needs shall be eligible to participate in the program, subject to the
department's procedures and guidelines and the availability of program funds.
Residents shall utilize a certified private analytical laboratory specified by
the department or the department may conduct the tests. Participating
residents shall pay $25 for the tests and the department shall cover the
remainder of the testing cost. One set of tests a year for each legal dwelling
may be requested under this program.

(b) The department shall establish procedures
and guidelines for the testing which shall:

(1) Identify sampling and analytical protocols;

(2) Specify report and notice requirements; and

(3) Determine participation eligibility procedures
and requirements.

(c) The department shall establish a
nonregulatory program that provides technical assistance to any resident
residing in a legal dwelling which relies on a water catchment system for the
resident's water needs for the purpose of improving water quality in that
system. To the extent practicable, the department shall assist the resident by
recommending practical and affordable methods to improve water quality, based
on the specific design and conditions of the water catchment system. [L 1997, c
218, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next